Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2283
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Senior Volunteer Program Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 23.